Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
CHAPTER 121A Public Financing Campaign Act

121A.005.
Short
title for chapter. [Repealed.]

121A.010.
Definitions
for chapter. [Repealed.]

121A.015.
Exploratory
committees for possible slates for Governor and Lieutenant Governor. [Repealed.]

121A.020.
Election
campaign fund — Transfers. [Repealed.]

121A.030.
Campaign
expenditure limitations. [Repealed.]

121A.040.
Statement
of intent. [Repealed.]

121A.050.
Contribution
limits. [Repealed.]

121A.060.
Certification
of qualification to receive transfer from fund. [Repealed.]

121A.070.
Deposit
of transferred funds — Duty of campaign treasurer. [Repealed.]

121A.080.
Amounts
transferred from fund. [Repealed.]

121A.090.
Recipients
of transfers subject to KRS Chapter 121. [Repealed.]

121A.100.
Televised
candidate forums or debates. [Repealed.]

121A.110.
Misuse
of transferred funds prohibited. [Repealed.]

121A.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]